Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 1999, chapter 241, article 4, section 25, subdivision 3, as added by Laws 2011, First Special Session chapter 11, article 4, section 7, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Independent School District No. 284, Wayzatanew text begin ; Independent School District No. 720, Shakopeenew text end . new text begin (a) new text end Independent School District No. 284, Wayzata, is eligible for the alternative facilities revenue program under Minnesota Statutesnew text begin 2011new text end , section 123B.59, for the purposes of financing school facilities in the district. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, beginning in fiscal year 2027, Independent School District No. 720, Shakopee, is a qualifying alternative facilities district for purposes of long-term facilities maintenance revenue under Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.595. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end